District of Columbia statutes.
46-352.06

Continuing jurisdiction to enforce child-support order.

(a)

A tribunal of the District that has issued a child-support order consistent with the law of the District, may serve as an initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce:

(1)

The order if the order is the controlling order and has not been modified by a tribunal of another state that assumed jurisdiction pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act; or

(2)

A money judgment for arrears of support and interest on the order accrued before a determination that an order of a tribunal of another state is the controlling order.

(b)

A tribunal of the District having continuing jurisdiction over a support order may act as a responding tribunal to enforce the order.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 206, 63 DCR 222